West Virginia, session 2026, HB5540.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS CONCERNING CRIME. §61-11-28. Due process. Any person arrested for an alleged civil or criminal violation in this state must be afforded due process and must be advised of the individual's right to remain silent, be advised of the individual's right to have an attorney present during questioning, and be provided the warning that anything that the individual says may be used against the individual in court.